Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
4. ESTABLISHMENT OF SUPPORT ORDER

OR
DETERMINATION OF PARENTAGE

Note

Article heading amended by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-401 Establishment of support order.
(a) If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been
issued, a responding tribunal of this State with personal jurisdiction over the
parties may issue a support order if:

(1) The individual seeking the order resides outside
this State; or

(2) The support enforcement agency seeking the order
is located outside this State.

(b) The tribunal may issue a temporary child
support order if the tribunal determines that the order is appropriate and the
individual ordered to pay is:

(1) A presumed father of the child;

(2) Petitioning to have paternity adjudicated;

(3) Identified as the father of the child through
genetic testing;

(4) An alleged father who has declined to submit to
genetic testing;

(5) Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the
father of the child;

(6) An acknowledged father as provided by section
584-3.5;

(7) The mother of the child; or

(8) An individual who has been ordered to pay child
support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or
vacated.

(c) Upon finding, after notice and opportunity
to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a
support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to
section 576B-305. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Case Notes

If a support order does not already exist pursuant to
subsection (a), the provisions of subsection (b) allow the responding tribunal
of this State to order the respondent to pay temporary child support if there
is sufficient indication, as defined by the statute, that the respondent is indeed
the child's parent; thus, the prepetition support awarded by the court was well
within the powers afforded the court by this chapter. 96 H. 373 (App.), 31
P.3d 230.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next